Illinois, session 104th, HB5324.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by adding 5Section 2-201.8 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 45/2-201.8 new)7    Sec. 2-201.8. Resident income applications.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Admission" means the first day in which a resident 10resides at a facility.11    "Screener" means a tool administered by the Social 12Security Administration that allows members of the public to 13check eligibility for Social Security benefits.14    (b) The purpose of this Section is to reduce delays in 15submitting applications for Supplemental Security Income and 16Social Security Disability Insurance for residents who may be 17eligible, as securing income is necessary for individuals 18transitioning from institutions to the community.19    (c) To facilitate timely applications for Supplemental 20Security Income or Social Security Disability Insurance, 21facilities shall assess residents using the Social Security 22Administration screener to check eligibility for Social 23Security benefits within 30 days after admission to a   HB5324- 2 -LRB104 18202 BAB 31641 b1facility.2    (d) If the resident is likely eligible, the facility shall 3assist the resident with completing an application within 60 4days after admission to a facility. Facilities must make staff 5available that are trained to gather complete, targeted, and 6relevant information resulting in high-quality Supplemental 7Security Income and Social Security Disability Insurance 8applications. Facilities may collaborate with third-party 9experts to meet this requirement as needed.10    (e) Within 6 months after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, facilities shall 12conduct a one-time assessment of all current residents and 13complete a Social Security Administration screener for all 14residents without income and without a pending Supplemental 15Security Income or Social Security Disability Insurance 16application. If the resident is likely eligible, the facility 17shall initiate an application within 60 days after conducting 18the screener.19    (f) Twice per year, each facility shall publicly post on 20the facility's website the number of residents screened and 21the number of applications initiated. 22    Section 10. The Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation 23Act of 2013 is amended by adding Section 3-202 as follows: 24    (210 ILCS 49/3-202 new)  HB5324- 3 -LRB104 18202 BAB 31641 b1    Sec. 3-202. Resident income applications. 2    (a) In this Section:3    "Admission" means the first day in which a resident 4resides at a facility facility.5    "Screener" means a tool administered by the Social 6Security Administration that allows members of the public to 7check eligibility for Social Security benefits.8    (b) The purpose of this Section is to reduce delays in 9submitting applications for Supplemental Security Income and 10Social Security Disability Insurance for residents who may be 11eligible, as securing income is necessary for individuals 12transitioning from institutions to the community.13    (c) To facilitate timely applications for Supplemental 14Security Income or Social Security Disability Insurance, 15facilities shall assess residents using the Social Security 16Administration screener to check eligibility for Social 17Security benefits within 30 days after admission to a 18facility.19    (d) If the resident is likely eligible, the facility shall 20assist the resident with completing an application within 60 21days after admission to a facility. Facilities must make staff 22available that are trained to gather complete, targeted, and 23relevant information resulting in high-quality Supplemental 24Security Income and Social Security Disability Insurance 25applications. Facilities may collaborate with third-party 26experts to meet this requirement as needed.  HB5324- 4 -LRB104 18202 BAB 31641 b1    (e) Within 6 months after the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, facilities shall 3conduct a one-time assessment of all current residents and 4complete a Social Security Administration screener for all 5residents without income and without a pending Supplemental 6Security Income or Social Security Disability Insurance 7application. If the resident is likely eligible, the facility 8shall initiate an application within 60 days after conducting 9the screener.10    (f) Twice per year, each facility shall publicly post on 11the facility's website the number of residents screened and 12the number of applications initiated. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.